Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,120
Visitation privileges; designation by patient.

A hospital patient who is nineteen years of age or older or an emancipated minor may designate at any time, orally or in writing, up to five individuals not legally related by marriage or blood to the patient whom the patient wishes to be given the same visitation privileges as an immediate family member of such patient. An individual so designated shall have the same visitation privileges as an immediate family member of such patient. The patient may rescind the designation or designations at any time, orally or in writing. Any designation or rescission made under this section shall be noted on the patient's medical records at such hospital. For purposes of this section, medical records means the hospital's record of a patient's health history and treatment rendered.

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 51.